lexd_components/hyw-abbr_affix.lexd
#######
######
######
### Digits, acronyms/abbreviations, and stranded suffixes

PATTERNS

#Just digits and numbers in numerical form
DigitNumbers [<num>:]

# Abbreviations for titles like պր. Mr.
AbbreviationTitles [:.]  [<abbr>:]
AbbreviationTitles   [<abbr>:]  # Dir/LR - analyse without the period but don't generate

# Numbers with abbreviations like  km
AbbreviationNumbers [<abbr>:]
DigitNumbers [:-]    AbbreviationNumbers [<num><abbr>:]
DigitNumbers      AbbreviationNumbers [<num><abbr>:]     # Dir/LR - analyse without the - but don't generate

# Numbers with inflection suffixes like 100-էն 
DigitNumbers [:-] [<num>:] StrandedAffixes 
DigitNumbers [<num>:] StrandedAffixes    # Dir/LR - analyse without the - but don't generate

# Numbers with the ordinal suffix
DigitNumbers [:-] [<num><ord>:րդ]
DigitNumbers [<num><ord>:րդ]  # Dir/LR - analyse without the - but don't generate

# Abbreviations that can take stranded inflection

AbbreviationDeclinable  [<abbr>:]  ([:-] StrandedAffixes)?
AbbreviationDeclinable   [<abbr>:] StrandedAffixes     # Dir/LR - analyse without the - but don't generate



PATTERN StrandedAffixes
# These are inflectional suffixes that are added on top of numbers and abbreviations
# They're just copies of nominal inflection suffixes like Def, PL, Case, etc. 
# I made them separate copies because there's a lot of glitches with stranded affixes because of tokenization problems
StrandedAffixDefSchwa|StrandedAffixPoss
StrandedAffixCaseRegI|StrandedAffixCaseOblique (StrandedAffixDefEither|StrandedAffixPoss)?
StrandedAffixPL (StrandedAffixCaseRegU|StrandedAffixCaseOblique)? (StrandedAffixDefEither|StrandedAffixPoss)?

LEXICON AbbreviationNumbers
# These are abbreviations that go after numbers
# Like abbreviations for dates and measures
թթ:թթ
թ:թ
քմ:քմ
մմ:մմ
մլն:մլն

LEXICON AbbreviationDeclinable
# These are abbreviations that stand in as nouns, and which can be declined
# Like ՀՀ-ի where 
ԱԳ:ԱԳ
ԱԳՆ:ԱԳՆ
ԳՄ:ԳՄ
ԵԱՀԿ:ԵԱՀԿ
ՀՀ:ՀՀ
ՀՄԸՄ:ՀՄԸՄ
ՀՅ:ՀՅ
ՀՅԴ:ՀՅԴ
ՀՕՄ:ՀՕՄ
ԱԹՍ:ԱԹՍ
ԳՇ:ԳՇ
ԶՈՒ:ԶՈՒ
ԻՒՆԵՍՔՕ:ԻՒՆԵՍՔՕ
ԼՂ:ԼՂ
ԿԳՄՍ:ԿԳՄՍ
ԿԿ:ԿԿ
ՀԱՊԿ:ՀԱՊԿ
ՆԱԹՕ:ՆԱԹՕ
ՊՆ:ՊՆ
ՌԴ:ՌԴ
ՍԴ:ՍԴ
ՍՕԽ:ՍՕԽ
ՔԱՍԱՏ:ՔԱՍԱՏ

LEXICON AbbreviationTitles
#These are abbreivations for titles. They are not declinable
պր:պր
դոկտ:դոկտ
հոգշ:հոգշ
ՍՕ:ՍՕ
քհնյ:քհնյ
աԺ:աԺ
արժ:արժ
արք:արք
գերշ:գերշ
եպս:եպս
ՆՍՕՏՏ:ՆՍՕՏՏ
շրջ:շրջ
սրբ:սրբ
վրդ:վրդ
տոքթ:տոքթ
պրն:պրն
աբղ:աբղ
ընկ:ընկ
ԺԱ:ԺԱ
ԺԲ:ԺԲ
կեդր:կեդր
եղբ:եղբ


PATTERN DigitNumbers
Digit+ 
Digit+ ([.]|[,]) Digit+

LEXICON Digit
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9

LEXICON StrandedAffixDefSchwa
#This is when the definite suffix is added onto the number/abbreviation
# We can't tell if the base is pronounced with a final vowel or not
<def>:ը
<def>:ն # Dir/LR in case the base has a pronounced vowel or pre-clitic
LEXICON StrandedAffixDefEither
#This is when the definite is added onto a stranded suffix
# Here we can tell if the base ends in a vowel or not 
<def>:{defն}
<def>:ն # Dir/LR for pre-clitic forms
LEXICON StrandedAffixPoss
<px1sg>:ս
<px1sg>:ըս # Dir/LR  -- in case of typos because EANC has this rule
<px2sg>:դ
<px2sg>:ըդ # Dir/LR  -- in case of typos because EANC has this rule
LEXICON StrandedAffixCaseRegI
<dat_gen>:ի
LEXICON StrandedAffixCaseOblique
<abl>:է
<abl>:ից # Dir/LR because of code-switching
<ins>:ով
<loc>:ում # Dir/LR because of code-switching
LEXICON StrandedAffixCaseRegU
<dat_gen>:ու 
LEXICON StrandedAffixPL
<pl>:ներ	
<pl>:եր	# Dir/LR
